Utah statutes.
78B-17-204.   Application to court.
An application to the court for a protective order or to enforce, quash, or
modify a subpoena issued by a clerk of court under Section 78B-17-201 must
comply with the rules or statutes of Utah and be submitted to the court in the
judicial district in which discovery is to be conducted.
